src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.dic
adinvenio/C
advenio/C
ambio/C
aperio/C
assentio/C
assentior/C
audio/C
blandior/C
comperio/C
concutio/C
consentio/C
convenio/C
convestio/C
coorior/C
counio/C
definio/C
deiicio/C
demetior/C
demolior/C
desaevio/C
devenio/C
diffinio/C
dimetior/C
disiicio/C
ementior/C
evenio/C
exhaurio/C
exilio/C
exordior/C
exorior/C
expedio/C
experior/C
ferio/C
finio/C
fulcio/C
garrio/C
haurio/C
ignio/C
impartio/C
impedio/C
impertio/C
inservio/C
invenio/C
largior/C
lascivio/C
mentior/C
metior/C
molior/C
munio/C
nescio/C
nutrio/C
ordior/C
orior/C
partio/C
perpolio/C
pervenio/C
polio/C
praesagio/C
praevenio/C
prosilio/C
provenio/C
reperio/C
resarcio/C
saepio/C
salio/C
scio/C
sentio/C
servio/C
sortior/C
stabilio/C
suborior/C
subsilio/C
supervenio/C
unio/C
venio/C
vestio/C
